Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 560 of Title 10, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The technique of in vitro fertilization or human embryo
transfer may be performed in this state by persons duly authorized
to practice medicine at the request and with the consent in writing
of the parties desiring the utilization of such technique for the
purpose of conceiving a child or children.
Req. No. 12520 Page 1

B. No person shall perform the technique of in vitro
fertilization or human embryo transfer unless currently licensed to
practice medicine in this state, and then only at the request and
with the written consent of the parties desiring the utilization of
such technique. Said consent shall be executed and acknowledged by
both the parties and the person who is to perform the technique.
C. Any child or children born as a result of in vitro
fertilization or human embryo transfer shall be considered, for all
legal intents and purposes, the same as a naturally conceived child
of the parties that consent to and receive in vitro fertilization or
human embryo transfer.
D. Human embryos created during in vitro fertilization shall be
considered at law the patient's property.
E. There shall be no limit to how many number of human embryos
that can be created or frozen in a single in vitro fertilization
cycle.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12520 TJ 01/10/25





Req. No. 12520 Page 2